schwaebisch.aff
#	Version: 0.2.4.12
#
#	Copyright (C) 2025-2026
#	Christof Schroth <christofschrothATgmxDOTnet>
#
#   License: GPL-3.0
#   There should be a copy of this license included
#   with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
#   versions using the GPL may only include the GPL.
#   Lizenz: GPL-3.0
#   Wer moent, r müaßt s benutza, därf des gern macha.
#   Wer moent, r müaßt dia Lizenz vrletza, kriagt da Ranzavol.

SET UTF-8
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößåôëESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÅÔË-.

# take a number from 1-65000 for the flags
FLAG num

KEEPCASE 88



# with this we force the spell checker to suggest the correct word
REP 30
REP büassa büaßa
REP geba gea
REP gibst geist
REP gibt geit
REP gent gebat
REP glassa glao
REP gschempft gschompfa
REP hat håt
REP ihn ehn
REP ißt isst
REP ka kå
REP kon kån
REP läßt låt
REP lässt låt
REP laß lass
REP lassa lao
REP lassat lent
REP muass muaß
REP müassa müaßa
REP müassat müaßat
REP nommal nômål
REP nommål nômål
REP paß pass
REP seasch saest
REP schlägt schlaet
REP schlägst schlaest
REP Aband Åbad
REP Haß Hass
REP Januar Jänner
REP Not Naot







####################################################################################################################
# Verbs/Tunwörter: generally speaking, the past tense is defined separately to make it easier to build compunds
# 1FNN
# 1: refers to suffixes of verbs
# F: 0 corresponds to present tense, 1 to past tense, 2 for irregular verbs, 3 to dummy (used for development 
#  purposes only)
# NN: number of rule 
####################################################################################################################
 

# regular verbs (Tunwörter regelmäßig) - present tense
SFX 1000 Y 4
SFX 1000   a       0           .
SFX 1000   a       st          .
SFX 1000   a       t           .
SFX 1000   a       at          .


# present tense of verbs that end by "da" or "na" (Tunwörter, die auf "da" enden, 4=d), some other verbs also fall in this rule
SFX 1004 Y 3
SFX 1004   a       e           .
SFX 1004   a       est         .
SFX 1004   a       at          .


# present tense of verbs that end by "iga" (Tunwörter, die auf "iga" enden, 9=i)
# this is almost the same to the regular case, only 1st person singular differs
# Note, that some other verbs that end by "iga" are still regular
# Note, that verbs ending by "era" (but not by "iera") follow the same rule  
SFX 1009 Y 4
SFX 1009   a       e           .
SFX 1009   a       st          .
SFX 1009   a       t           .
SFX 1009   a       at          .


# present tense of verbs that end by "la" (Tunwörter, die auf "la" enden, 12=l)
# needs a double check
SFX 1012 Y 5
SFX 1012  la       le          .    # checked, passt (Befehlsform 1. Person)
SFX 1012  la       el          .    # needs double check
SFX 1012  la       lest        .    # needs double check
SFX 1012  la       lt          .    # needs double check
SFX 1012  la       lat         .    # checked, passt (3. Person Plural)


# present tense of verbs that end by "era", but not by "iera" (Tunwörter, die auf "era" enden, 18=r)
SFX 1018 Y 5
SFX 1018   a       e           .
SFX 1018   a       0           .
SFX 1018   a       st          .
SFX 1018   a       t           .
SFX 1018   a       at          .


# present tense of verbs that end by "sa", "za", or "ßa" (Tunwörter, die auf "sa" enden, 19=s)
SFX 1019 Y 3
SFX 1019   a       0           .
SFX 1019   a       t           .
SFX 1019   a       at          .


# present tense of verbs that end by "ta" (Tunwörter, die auf "ta" enden, 20=t)
SFX 1020 Y 4
SFX 1020   a       0           .
SFX 1020   a       e           .
SFX 1020   a       est         .
SFX 1020   a       at          .


# conjunctive form of verbs (Möglichkeitsformen bzw. Konjunktiv 2 Konstruktionen, 03=c)
SFX 1103 Y 3
SFX 1103   0       est         .
SFX 1103   0       t           [^t]
SFX 1103   0       e           .




####################################################################################################################
# Prefixes for verbs - Präfixe für Tunwörter 1XXNN
# 1: prefix for verbs
# XX: number of first letter in the prefix in the alphabet
# NN: enumeration
# Missing suffixes (may be added in future versions): hentre, zwischa, drzwischa
####################################################################################################################


# Prefixes starting by "a"
PFX 10101 Y 1
PFX 10101   0       a          .
PFX 10102 Y 1
PFX 10102   0       ab         .
PFX 10103 Y 1
PFX 10103   0       ae         .
PFX 10104 Y 1
PFX 10104   0       auf        .
PFX 10105 Y 1
PFX 10105   0       aus        .
PFX 10106 Y 1
PFX 10106   0       ausanander .
# Prefixes starting by "b"
PFX 10201 Y 1
PFX 10201   0       be         .
PFX 10202 Y 1
PFX 10202   0       bei        .
PFX 10203 Y 1
PFX 10203   0       beraet     .
# Prefixes starting by "d"
PFX 10401 Y 1
PFX 10401   0       dar        .
PFX 10402 Y 1
PFX 10402   0       drauf      .
PFX 10403 Y 1
PFX 10403   0       drvo       .
PFX 10404 Y 1
PFX 10404   0       drüber     .
PFX 10405 Y 1
PFX 10405   0       durch      .
PFX 10406 Y 1
PFX 10406   0       dranna     .
PFX 10407 Y 1
PFX 10407   0       drher      .
PFX 10408 Y 1
PFX 10408   0       drzua      .
PFX 10409 Y 1
PFX 10409   0       drå        .
PFX 10410 Y 1
PFX 10410   0       då         .
# Prefixes starting by "e"
PFX 10501 Y 1
PFX 10501   0       ent        .
PFX 10502 Y 1
PFX 10502   0       entgega    .
PFX 10503 Y 1
PFX 10503   0       er         .
# Prefixes starting by "f"
PFX 10601 Y 1
PFX 10601   0       fertig     .
PFX 10602 Y 1
PFX 10602   0       fest       .
PFX 10603 Y 1
PFX 10603   0       fort       .
PFX 10604 Y 1
PFX 10604   0       frei       .
# Prefixes starting by "g"
PFX 10701 Y 1
PFX 10701   0       gleich     .
PFX 10702 Y 1
PFX 10702   0       grad       .
PFX 10703 Y 1
PFX 10703   0       guat       .
# Prefixes starting by "h"
PFX 10801 Y 1
PFX 10801   0       haoch      .
PFX 10802 Y 1
PFX 10802   0       he         .
PFX 10803 Y 1
PFX 10803   0       henter     .
PFX 10804 Y 1
PFX 10804   0       her        .
PFX 10805 Y 1
PFX 10805   0       hoem       .
# Prefixes starting by "l"
PFX 11201 Y 1
PFX 11201   0       leer       .
PFX 11202 Y 1
PFX 11202   0       los        .
# Prefixes starting by "m"
PFX 11301 Y 1
PFX 11301   0       mit        .
# Prefixes starting by "n"
PFX 11401 Y 1
PFX 11401   0       na         .
PFX 11402 Y 1
PFX 11402   0       nae        .
PFX 11403 Y 1
PFX 11403   0       nauf       .
PFX 11404 Y 1
PFX 11404   0       naus       .
PFX 11405 Y 1
PFX 11405   0       nieder     .
PFX 11406 Y 1
PFX 11406   0       nom        .
PFX 11407 Y 1
PFX 11407   0       nüber      .
PFX 11408 Y 1
PFX 11408   0       nåch       .
PFX 11409 Y 1
PFX 11409   0       nô         .
# Prefixes starting by "o"
PFX 11501 Y 1
PFX 11501   0       om         .
PFX 11502 Y 1
PFX 11502   0       omanander  .
PFX 11503 Y 1
PFX 11503   0       onter      .
# Prefixes starting by "r"
PFX 11801 Y 1
PFX 11801   0       ra         .
PFX 11802 Y 1
PFX 11802   0       rae        .
PFX 11803 Y 1
PFX 11803   0       ran        .
PFX 11804 Y 1
PFX 11804   0       rauf       .
PFX 11805 Y 1
PFX 11805   0       raus       .
PFX 11806 Y 1
PFX 11806   0       rom        .
PFX 11807 Y 1
PFX 11807   0       ronter     .
# Prefixes starting by "s"
PFX 11901 Y 1
PFX 11901   0       sicher     .
# Prefixes starting by "v"
PFX 12201 Y 1
PFX 12201   0       vol        .
PFX 12202 Y 1
PFX 12202   0       voll       .
PFX 12203 Y 1
PFX 12203   0       vorbei     .
PFX 12204 Y 1
PFX 12204   0       vr         .
PFX 12205 Y 1
PFX 12205   0       vôr        .
# Prefixes starting by "w"
PFX 12301 Y 1
PFX 12301   0       weg        .
PFX 12302 Y 1
PFX 12302   0       weiter     .
PFX 12303 Y 1
PFX 12303   0       wider      .
PFX 12304 Y 1
PFX 12304   0       wieder     .
# Prefixes starting by "z"
PFX 12601 Y 1
PFX 12601   0       zr         .
PFX 12602 Y 1
PFX 12602   0       zrück      .
PFX 12603 Y 1
PFX 12603   0       zsema      .
PFX 12604 Y 1
PFX 12604   0       zua        .
# note the following order for Sondezeichen 31:ä, 32:å, 33:ô, 34:ö, 35:ü
# Prefixes starting by "å" 
PFX 13201 Y 1
PFX 13201   0       å          .
# Prefixes starting by "ü"
PFX 13501 Y 1
PFX 13501   0       über       .
PFX 13502 Y 1
PFX 13502   0       übrig      .



####################################################################################################################
# Nouns & Person groups - Personengruppen & Hauptwörter 2FNN
# 2: suffix for nouns
# F: flag, whereby 1 corresponds to person groups, 2 to other nouns, 3 a list of regular suffixes that appear over and over again, 
#  9 is to mark irregular plural forms, unkown or not yet defined
# NN: enumeration
####################################################################################################################


# Nouns that refer to groups of persons (Personengruppen regelmäßig)
SFX 2101 Y 2
SFX 2101   er      e           .
SFX 2101   er      a           .


# Nouns that refer to persons (Personen, bei denen die weibliche Form mit "e" gebildet wird) - "e" corresponds to female singular, "enna" corresponds to female plural, male is the same for singular and plural
SFX 2102 Y 2
SFX 2102   0       e           .
SFX 2102   0       enna        .


# Standard plural form: adding "a" Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "a" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "a" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2200 Y 4
SFX 2200   0       a           [^e]
SFX 2200   e       a           ie        # examples: Battrie, Energie (it might make sense to write "Battriea" and "Energiea"
SFX 2200   e       a           [^i]e
SFX 2200   ë       a           ë




# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "s", usually words taken from English language (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "s" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204   0       s           .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "e" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "e" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205   0       e           .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "er" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "er" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2206 Y 1
SFX 2206   0       er          .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by changing "el" to "la" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "la" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207   el       la          


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "ta" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "ta" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208   0        ta          .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "ena" (Mehrzahlformen, die mit "ena" am Ende gebildet werden)
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209   0        ena         .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by changing "tom" to "tümer" (Mehrzahlformen, bei denen "tom" zu "tümer" wird)
SFX 2210 Y 3
SFX 2210   tom      tümer       .
SFX 2210   nis      nisse       .
SFX 2210   uss      üss         .


# Nouns for which the plural form is built by adding "na", e.g. Stadio, (Mehrzahlformen, bei denen "na" angehängt wird, weil man das "n" in der Einzahlform weglässt beim aussprechen)
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211   0        na          .
